Don't know what the fuss is about this place. After moving back from Shanghai, I was craving Shanghainese food and this place has got it. It's decent and I've always had pretty good service. My family is Shanghainese and we eat here all the time and have never been dissatisfied. These American yuppies just can't handle reasonable Shanghai cuisine. Ya it's more pricey than your Mr Chaus and panda express but deal with it that shit ain't real Chinese food.
We've been to the current location a few times, and something's changed. The old location was (El Camino Way) was getting a bit old and dirty, but some of the foods were just tastier and spicier. The current location is convenient, with lots more parking, and a cleaner atmosphere, but the food is just not as good. The only thing I eat are the vegetarian dishes, though someone in our group usually gets a few chicken or meat plates. The veggie dumplings are still OK, and service is still good. Larger parking lot is a plus.
I'm pretty surprised to find all these negative YELP reviews. First of all, I've been to Su Hong many times. I even take my parents here when they visit from Taiwan and they are PICKY about Chinese food. I will not take my parents to just any Chinese restaurant for fear of being deemed a bad daughter with no taste buds. I've always had good service and good food at Su Hong. But that said, I would definitely stick to Shanghai classics at this place. Do not order orange chicken and broccoli beef here, because real Chinese people don't eat those things. Instead, maybe try their crab meat lion's head meatballs or smoked tea duck. I would ask for recommendations if you want some classic Shanghaiese dishes. (It probably helps if you happen to speak Chinese). This is also not a good place for you if you're vegetarian/vegan. They have limited vegetarian options and those aren't clearly marked. But overall, this place earns the Chinese parents' seal of approval. My dad even said that he wants to come back here next time he visits the Bay Area.
I've eaten here a few times - it's convenient, serves decent Shanghai fare, and relatively inexpensive.  I stick with their classic dishes figuring I couldn't go wrong with those, and I have been generally right. The first time, I tried their Xiao Long Bao with Crabmeat.  It wasn't THE best but it was good enough with six to an order; don't count on tasting much of the crabmeat though.  Their stir-fried hand shaved noodles with pork and pickled turnip was ok. The next visit I went for their Zha Jian Mian, expecting it to be served with julienne cucumber, scallions and the minced pork on top of the boiled noodles.  What emerged was adulterated form and format (see pic) of the classic dish - just miso stir fried chopped pork and edamame; the noodles were smothered under the sauce.  The taste was different but again, good enough. My last visit I tried their Shanghai noodles in soup.  It was a simple bowl of wholesome noodles with some sauteed pork strips, napa cabbage and shitake mushrooms.  I liked it although I would've preferred less oil used.  I ordered their boiled pork dumplings to go.  They still tasted good the next day although I found the dumpling skin a bit thick/tough.  The meat stuffing was dense and didn't have the delicacy and mix of vegetables usually found with Cantonese style dumplings. I'll still eat here if in the area.  It's good enough.
Solid food. Decent restaurant. Maybe if I eat here more often it will jump to 4 stars. My friends swear by this place.
They had some vegan/vegetarian options which I liked however the service the last time I went was less than good. We called ahead and they claimed we called somewhere else but we had their recent call in our phone and called their place again to let them know we weren't mistaken. I think the person at the front just messed up orders and we had to order all over again. Next time I wish they would just own up instead of blaming the customer. I have had good experiences and bad there but hopefully they can get it together.
Decent xiao long bao for the price which was a nice surprise.
I must say, I'm not impressed and I certainly had better chinese food at Su Hong before. We went for lunch today and the food was extremely mediocre chinese food and the prices are not cheap (well, it's Palo Alto!). All the stir fry dishes that we ordered lacked the "fragrance" smell of the usual chinese food. It was a bit too sweet or just salty, lack of the complexity of flavor in authentic chinese food. The Wuxi ribs that we had was a bit too sweet. They used plum sauce to cook the ribs. If you like american style baby back ribs BBQ, you will probably enjoy this dish, but this one of course lack the smokiness from the regular american BBQ :). A tad too sweet for my taste. The Xiao long bao was good BUT it's nothing to rave about. I appreciate that the skin was thin and there was a lot of "soup" inside and none of the dumpling leaked. But flavor wise, it's "been there, done that" type. Cumin lamb was not as spicy as it should be and there were too much of "fillers" like large cubes of onions and bell peppers. The bean curd and mushroom dish was good, a lot more tofu than the mushroom and it's not something I couldn't make at home. Although, I must admit that I like the fried tofu that they used, not sour! My favorite today was the drunken chicken. I'm a bone in chicken person, but for the first time today, I really appreciated the chicken being de-boned though! LOL! This is a very interesting dish. It reminded me of "hainan style chicken" and "san tung style chicken." It's basically poached chicken marinaded in chinese white wine. It was served "COLD!" The flavor was amazing though... it had enough saltiness and flavor AND I didn't smell any fowl gross smell in the meat. PLUS! I probably won't be back for a while though, not impressed with their food..I think I prefer the lower price Hong Konh Restaurant down the street and Chef Chu. Total was $80 to split 5 ways. We had some leftover.
Su Hong is certainly a neighborhood favorite for Chinese Food. My company also often orders food... Read more 
Ate here once on a Saturday night with a friend who recommended it.  I got an order of General chicken and BBQ pork chow mein.  The General chicken was so-so...maybe a 2.75/5.  It had an overwhelming green onion taste to it that really killed the dish for me.  It probably would have benefited from a little more spice too.  The chow mein was also just below mediocre...another 2.75/5.  The chow mein was a little bland and more greasy than I'm used to.  The food was ready pretty quick.  I can't comment on the service because I got it to go. The worst thing about this place is the insane prices here.  My two dishes (small sizes) were $16.  Paying that much for mediocre/slightly below average food is not my idea of a good time.  The prices are fairly high across the board, with the exception of the fried rice dishes, which are reasonable.  I didn't try the fried rice, so I can't recommend it. Just because this restaurant is in Palo Alto doesn't mean they can automatically charge ridiculous prices for a small portion of food that isn't very good.  I'd consider coming back here if the food was better, the portions were doubled, or the prices were cut in half, but since it is likely none of those will ever happen, I'm going to try to forget I ever wasted my money here.
Wow Su Hong. Nice work. I'm not usually a fan of Chinese food, but when we went this time with the extended family, my tastebuds were quite happy (except for maybe one dish...) Started off the meal with egg rolls and won ton soup. Egg rolls were decent, but won ton soup was bombbb, and I like how they evenly split the soup into cups with equal portions (yay OCD-ness). The next dish was a bit iff-y. Hamyu was my great grandfather's favorite dish hands-down, but man, I have not smelt something that bad since Taiwan's stinky tofu...I can't believe I actually ate it! It was pretty fishy, but over rice, I managed to eat it in respect for the elders. The dishes following the Hamyu were great - my favorite being the sweet and sour pork. Since I'm so used to Chinese take-out being really mushy and more saucy, this was a welcome change, with pork that actually tasted like pork, and the sauce was a bit lighter, which I appreciated. It's really too bad that we were in such a rush since I had to get back home quickly, but definitely one of the best Chinese food meals I've had in a while!
The Imperial pork dish was absolutey disgusting, malodorous and incompletely cooked. Being a microbiologist, I took a sample to the lab to see what they had been serving me over the last few weeks. It grew E. Coli, an organism found in feces. Absolutely disgusting. I'm never going to this restaurant again. The restaurant deserves 0 stars. I'm going to take my results to the department of health. I rarely write reviews, but I think the restaurant is a public health hazard and people should be aware of my experience.
PRO's - - Great menu selection - Very good tasting food - Nice location - Decent parking spaces in the back CON's - - Dining area could be setup better OVERALL - - Very nice dining experience; great tasting food, friendly service and the wait time from ordering to receiving the dishes is not long at all. They don't seem to use too much oil in their Chow Mien dishes; which at other Chinese restaurants they always seem to put in too much oil. Would recommend Su-Hong...enjoy!!
Was my first taste of Shanghainese food, and I absolutely loved it. I liked the spicy tofu , potato and eggplant dish and the soup that was provided. Fills you up pretty good.
I have enjoyed eating at Su Hong for several years.  I especially appreciate their fast service.  My favorite dishes include their duck and their soups.  Some items are priced a little on the high side but maybe that is expected in Palo Alto.
A lot of Chinese diners at a Chinese restaurant is usually always a good sign, especially at an Americanized place like this one that has been around for awhile... The lunch menu here is pretty simple, and the food comes out pretty quickly once ordered. I had the Szechuan beef, which was more celery than anything else. It came with good fried rice, bland hot and sour soup, and some really sad chow mein. Can't complain all that much for the price, though... The service here is very quick and efficient, but rather impersonal as well. I wasn't all that impressed, but maybe it was just me. They must have two locations for a reason...
Super bland, not pleased at all. I selected it because it was close and open late. I read the reviews AFTER I ate, I wasn't aware they not really considered a Chinese food restaurant. I ordered four "white folks" Chinese American dishes and they were taste-less. I agree with other reviews that for the price point they are in , Su Hong really needs to step it up. Just kind of a spendy let down for dinner for one. Bummer.
Came here for lunch today with coworkers as they had been to this place in the past when they used to be at a different location. Parking lot is huge, and the restaurant is larger than what I had expected from the outside. we all went with lunch specials, and there's also a VIP lunch, where you can order an entree from the regular menu and have white rice and hot and sour soup at no charge. There were also xlb's on the menu, $7.50 for 8 of them, and I was so tempted!!! Must try next time since everyone raves about it. The lunch specials, there's only about a dozen entrees (standard and most popular entrees) and 5 different types of chow funs. I went with the lunch special since you get bbq pork fried rice, chow mein, fried spring roll, hot and sour soup and the entree for $10. I went with the Schezwan beef, since it was one of the 3 that were spicy. Food all came out at different times, and mine was the last. The bbq pork fried rice hardly had any pork, but it was good. The chow mein was typical, but noodles were way overcooked. The beef was tasty, with carrots and celery, but was tooooooooo flavorful. A bit too salty as well. Service was decent, you didn't have one waiter, so as people passed by, would have to ask for refills on water. Waited a while for the check as well. Also, their table cloths, you get lint all over your slacks, and when I pulled on the table cloth, I saw major stains! And crumbs getting all over my pants. Clean your tablecloths guys! All in all, a decent experience, but not the best.
Came here today for lunch , got seated quickly. Overall its 1 step up from a panda express. Service is mediocre, but fast. Ordered family style. Honey walnut shrimp- definitely NOT the best i've had. the batter they had used was just awful. the glaze for it was just alright. Beef broccoli- good. but then again, how do you fuck up beef broccoli Mongolian beef- almost tasted just like the beef broccoli with but just a tad spicy and with different vegetables shanghai crispy noodle: pretty good, came with beef and chicken and assorted vegetables, the crispy noodle here is thick, unlike most shanghai noodles vegetarian soup (tofu): i liked this one, it was pretty good and tangy, kind of like hot and sour soup chicken salad: its fried chicken tossed in some shredded iceberg lettuce or something, the dressing was light, so that was nice PROS: 1. fast service 2. refilled water CON: 1. not very attentive as to whether we wer doing okay with our food and if we needed anything else 2. honey walnut shrimp sucked
I don't usually like eating out for Chinese food because usually it's really greasy, and it never tastes as good as my mom's cooking.  But I think Su Hong is an exception.  I came here with my family, so my parents ordered the food, and everything turned out pretty good. BRAISED SEACUCUMBER ($18.95) : Okay, I don't touch this stuff, but my brother really liked it and said the sauce was delicious. STIR FRIED HAND SHAVED NOODLE WITH SEAFOOD ($8.75) : Nice and chewy knife cut noodles.  Not too many places make this well. TOFU WITH CRAB MEAT ($13) : Yummy! It's a pretty light tasting dish, where the crab meat just adds a nice flavor to the tofu. CHICKEN WITH CHESTNUT ($13) : Definitely my favorite for the night!! I love chestnuts and chicken so this is the perfect combination.  Plus, the chestnuts coated in their sauce tastes even better than just plan roasted.  I've actually ordered this to go a few times just because I love it so much. I haven't had anything like this at other Chinese restaurants. WATER BOILED SPICY FISH : Eh, this was okay.  It wasn't bad, but I've had better elsewhere. CHINESE CREPE WITH RED BEAN PASTE ($3.25) : This was on the house, and I really liked it.
What I think is the biggest misconception about Su Hong Eatery is that most people don't realize it is a restaurant specializing in Shanghai cuisine. To be honest, it's a bit ridiculous for people to walk in and order typical Chinese food and expect it to be amazing. I did happen to try some non-Shanghainese food and agree that it isn't the greatest, but the Shanghai rice cakes were really good. Price: 4 Atmosphere: 3 Service: 3 Food (All but Shanghai): 2 Shanghainese Food: 4 Overall, this is a good place to go if you want to eat only Shanghai food and nothing else.
We have been coming to Su Hong in Menlo Park for years. So glad to hear when the Palo Alto location moved to the El Camino location. It is Jonathan favorite Chinese restaurant. He loves the Snow White Chicken. Other favorites they do better than most are the Orange Beef and especially the Pine Nut Chicken.
Got food poisoning here, not once, but on two occasions fifteen years apart.  Nuff said!
We moved to Mountain View from Redwood City and were pleased to find out that a Su Hong was close by, as we thoroughly enjoyed Su Hong in Menlo Park. Our joy had soon changed. One thing that caught our attention right away was when the waiter mentioned to us that it was the same name and 'some' of the recipes were still being used, BUT the ownership had changed, usually 'NOT GOOD'. Though I must say the service was good, other than the bartender smelled like an ashtray (Sorry, but true). We ordered Xiao Long Bao with Crab Meat to start. It was good, but when we ordered it, I asked the waiter, "Is it real crab or imitation?". He responded,"It's real crab!" When he returned, he offered "We make these fresh to order, never frozen!" Ok, I didn't ask about that, but usually that tells me they may be nervous. Doesn't matter, we ate them and enjoyed them...I think they were frozen... We then ordered our usuals from Menlo Park. Ok, here come the biased review, but they said they used some of the original recipes (maybe not for our dishes). They were DEFINITELY greasier than what we were used to, though the prices were better as far as the amount of food you get. It's very difficult to write an unbiased review when you go to a restaurant that has the same name as the one you love. HELLO! Why do you think places like McDonald's are so successful! Same name, same product!! Oh yeah, one other thing. Their menu is HUGE!!! It's so big, they put a note on there asking for you not to ask about to many items on the menu...because it's so BIG!! How can you make so many items "FRESH TO ORDER"...NOT POSSIBLE!!!! Sorry, kind of disappointed.........
I wish I could say I really liked the Palo Alto Su Hung, because I used to.  Back when they were on El Camino Way, the food was much better.  Our family ate there frequently, initially just sit down, but then mostly take out. At their new location, the combination fried rice is still my absolute favorite anywhere, but the rest of their food just lacks something.  The hot and sour soup, which used to be another fave, just doesn't work any more; not enough flavor, and where are the lilies, fungus and shitakes?  Same with other dishes I've had in the last year.  Maybe it's due to the change in menu focus or I just prefer other styles? The prices are a little steep too. I've never had a problem with the staff, but last night the woman at the counter must have been having a bad day; very distracted...
Good Chinese food. Maybe slightly pricy, but acceptable. The old lady who normally pick up the phone is not very friendly but everyone else is ok.
Came here with a large group today. Service here was very good. Waiters all spoke English and were attentive, refilled drinks, etc. The food was OK. Some of it was bland, like the kung pao chicken and the beef with broccoli. We ordered a lot of different dishes and most of them tasted the same. I think we had 4 different dishes that tasted identical. Not sure if I would ever come back here.
Good food most of the time. But so RUDE!!! With the prices at least you could be polite. I got a chinese chicken salad with nothing on it no dressing and no nuts or anything. So disappointed. I won't be back.
I'm giving this place the short end of the stick unfortunately.... simply because I came here for lunch and afterwards I went to dinner at the most awesome chinese restaurant in the bay area. We ordered a bunch of dishes such as Spare Ribs (could have been tastier), Lo Mein (a tad salty),  Fried Fish (which was really really good), and a slab of meat which is something I've had before (I don't know the name of it in english), XLB (which was eh....) Overall the experience could be better ps: The Service was fine, the food was just "eh"
So there is quite a bit of confusion. There is a Su Hong Eatery in PA and a Su Hong in Menlo Park. They used to be owned by the same person but he ended up selling off his MP location. The menus are drastically different and the Eatery in PA tends to have more Shanghainese cuisine. The food here was delicious, Hubsters and I ordered a bunch of dishes with the idea that we were going to be eating leftovers during the week so I didn't need to cook. We had the braised fish belly, knife cut noodles, house special tofu, lions head meatballs, and a bean curd yellow chive dish. Food was excellent, service was prompt. I'm not a fan of lions head meatballs, they taste like meatloaf to me so I can't comment too much on it. I have never met a meatball that I liked. The knife cut noodles had a good chew to them. Some were sliced too thin so they were slightly gummy. Fish belly was parfried and then cooked in a sweet sauce. The fish was cut in cross sections so there was plenty of meat. Hubsters complained that the meat to belly ratio wasn't very generous. The dish was definitely overpriced for what it was advertised as. Bean curd was delicious and same with the house special tofu. Definite hits and some misses but it looks like we have a new place to take my Shanghainese Food loving Father In law!
Greasy food. 6 dollars extra automatic charge for delivery! Rude hostess.
Came after a day of errands w/ the bestie and her bf... Xiao long bao. we ordered 2 types, crab and pork. Yum! The soup was a bit sparse, but the flavor was there. the skin was a bit chewy. but it'll fulfill my craving for XLB when i'm in Norcal... Shitake and asparagus veggie dish... yum! :) Silver roll w condensed milk.... Yum! This is so simple and yet somehow it's still pretty good. They have bevvies here! Mai tai was so good, her bf ordered this even after having it just a few nights before. lol. I'll be back to try some of the other dishes.
DO NOT USE: Are listed as Chinese, Caterers.  Successful caterers deliver their food, as agreed, on-time if not early. TWICE, they were over an hour late delivering food for a working dinner of 20.  The second time I re-confirmed earlier that day, and they still showed up late.  It was like they left when they should have arrived. Will never order from Su Hong Eatery & Chinese Restaurant, Palo Alto, again...
I don't know why this place got such bad reviews. I really liked the lunch here. I was craving some good 'bad chinese' and stopped in here. They have lunch specials with soup, egg roll, fried rice and chow mein and all their other entrees come with hot and sour soup and rice. I read on Yelp not to order their Americanized dishes so I got the Dong Bo Pork. It came with 4 huge chunks of pork belly on a bed of spinach and it was GOOD. I could only make it through 1.5 pieces and took the rest to go. Waiters were attentive with water and friendly. I noticed a lot of people got Xiao Long Bao so I may want to try that if I ever come back.
It's a decent restaurant - if you like Americanized Chinese food. Really caters toward the American crowd, which isn't necessarily a bad thing. My family, and I, unfortunately prefer authentic Chinese food, so while we would go to Su Hong if we really needed somewhere to eat, we usually just opted to drive a bit farther or eat at home. It's not as Americanized as some other options, but while we always ordered the more "authentic" Chinese dishes, we never really liked their food that much. It's okay, but considering its price, I'd rather drive a little farther to get something cheaper and better.
I'm reading all these negative reviews...  you guys need to man up and understand friggin Chinese food! Seriously... some of these reviews... "I didn't like the orange beef, orange chicken, lemon chicken, beef chow fun.... BLAH BLAH BLAH" Su Hong is a Shanghainese/Zhejiang Chinese restaurant (more specifically the name refers to SuZhou and Hangzhou -- but for simplicity sake it's closest to Shanghainese).  You don't go here and order Americanized Chinese fare (read Lemon Chicken, Orange beef, sweet n sour pork) or Cantonese dishes (read Beef chow fun, har gow, etc.) All of you who ranked it down on these dishes, need to get a clue.  You come here to eat the Shanghainese food.  The proof?  How about on weekends when much of the brunch clientele isn't speaking Mandarin, but Shanghainese...   The Shanghainese crew knows where to go and this is it. My faves: shredded dried tofu with bamboo and minced pork yellow chives with shanghainese eel Shanghainese style pork roast Knife cut noodles with Shanghainese veggies and minced pork Shanghainese sweet/sour whole fish Shanghainese cold drunken chicken The xiao long bao are just okay, and not spectacular The lion's head meatball are also just ok, but not as juicy (or fatty) as many others. So... for those of you ripping on the fact that a Shanghainese restaurant's orange beef, mongolian beef, beef chow fun, and lemon chicken sucks... this is akin to going to an Italian restaurant and ordering Cajun food and saying it sucks.  What sucks is your choice of dishes!  Go to Su Hong and order the Shanghainese dishes... you won't go wrong.
I'd been avoiding this place for a while since my only experience was from take-out from co-workers... Read more 
This the best Shanghai food restaurant I have tried in the Bay Area.  Their XiaoLongBao is pure heaven.   Service can be occassionally sketchy but I go there for the authentic Shanghai food not for the atmosphere. I cannot believe there are all these Americans who have no clue about Chinese food making bad reviews about the food after ordering American style Chinese food or Sichuan food in a Shanghai restaurant.  The funniest comment is the one who complained that the KungPao Chicken is too spicy.   It will be interesting for this person to try KungPao Chicken in a real Sichuan restaurant.
I eat here too much! Kidney dish is yummy!
My family and I love this restaurant.  We can go there to get our craving for Chinese food filled... Read more 
4.5 star for ambience and service and 2.5 star for food. One of my Shanghainese friend told me about this place and on my xiao long bao rave, I came for lunch.  On a Sat late lunch the place was surprisingly full.  The clientele was half Chinese and half caucasian. The first impression we had about this place was very good because the decoration looked upscale and the service was fast, attentative and responsive throughout. For the two of us, we ordered Pu Pu Platter(for 2) with BBQ Ribs, Fried Prawns, Beef Teriyakes and Spring Rolls, Xiao Long Bao, Green Chive Turnover and Sweetened Soy Bean Milk. I was very disappointed at the food.  When we thought last night's dinner at Shanghai Restaurant (Cupertino) was not that great, it was 3 times better than Su Hong.  In Su Hong, the Xiao Long Bao had thick skin and very little juice, a few of them were actually broken!  The chive turnover also had thick skin.  The platter had too much deep fried food to my liking.  The sweetened soy bean milk was OK, not too sweet but full of soy bean flavor. The table next to us seemed to have better food.  Their Pork in Peking Sauce(w. pancakes) seemed delicious.  Next time I'll try that and skip the xiao long bao.
I can't believe this place used to be a Denny's. Came here with my parents for lunch. We got wuxi spareribs, shanghai wontons (xiao long bao) and mushu pork. The xiao long bao were actually pretty good. My parents and I were comparing them to Shanghai Dumpling over on DeAnza and we decided that they matched up pretty well. The wuxi spareribs were good, too. Tender, tasty. The mushu pork... we've had better at a lot of places. That's what we get for ordering a stereotypical Chinese food dish :P Everything came with hot and sour soup (thumbs up), rice, and of course, tea. Service was fast. I would say that in the bay area, this restaurant is nothing special. But it is definitely a solid option for dinner or lunch, and while you won't leave thinking this was the best food you've ever had, you also won't leave regretting what you ate.
Delivery is awful. Undercooked, slow service, utensils not included when we requested them, and driving directions were specifically not followed!
Terrible, like a bad casino buffet version of Chinese food :(
2+ years later on a brunchy Saturday, hopes were riding high for a replica of that sexcellent experience by Su, and no that's not a gal's name, but Su Hong Eatery in Palo Alto. Well, either Su was gone, or someone was pretending to be the ol' Su in the kitchen. All items were ordered from the Chinese menu (ie the version that contains no mu shu poo poo doo doo broo hoo hoo watered down offerings, only OG $hiznit $hanghaine$e) Hot sweet soymilk - Upon stirring the bowl, we found no traces of sugar grains at the bottom of the bowl. This was way too sweet. And worst of all tasted not just like supermarket bottles but even worse than China Bee in San Mateo! Oh dang, what happened? Ordered a yoh tieo (fried cruller, of which a greasy version I fondly dub Chinese Peter North oil stick) but it never came. Luckily it did not show up on the bill. Chicken noodle soup (ji tang huei mien) -  Tender yet soggy noodles (by default), tender juicy chicken breast julienne slices, and green veg cooked long enough that it was soft (and easy to hide) with a mild ok chicken stock. Definitely nowhere near the great versions of "luen ji huei mien" at Shanghai restaurants in Hong Kong where the chicken stock is a lot thicker and richer. Parents with picky eaters might do well to get this (it's on the Chinese menu). Vegetarian dish (forgot the name) but it was basically mushrooms on the inside, wrapped around tofu skin (yuba) with a thick stew soy sauce and edamame. Not bad. But the absolute worst offender was Xiao Long Bao ^^^^^^ {@@ } {            } {       /\      } ------------ I don't know what happened, but as soon as the XLBs cooled down to non scalding levels, the skins were chewy, tough, and dry. The soup inside was on the bland side, although plentiful, but not savory enough like many other places. Even the quality of the black vinegar and julienne young ginger seemed a bit off. What happened? Seems like Little Shanghai, Bund Shanghai, Sunny Shanghai, even Shanghai Family in Mountain View, and even Koi Palace, have taken over the top rankings for this juicy little morsel. SHE was hotter than a Yelp attention whore a few years ago, but either SHE wasn't all that, or I caught her on a really bad day. SHE is probably 30 or 40+++ years old. A MILF or a Cougar still wowing the crowds 2 years ago, but something happened and SHE isn't being requested as much these days (at least it was not very busy inside of her on Saturday). I'm talkin about Su Hong Eatery (S.H.E) during brunch Saturday of course. I sincerely hope I went on an off-day... Other than XLB, I'll stick with Joy in Foster City for my Northern style brunch fare then for now... For now this Shanghai has become Shang Low.
My brother used to go to a place called Su Hong in Menlo Park in the 80s, and slammed it heavily for... Read more 
Usually somewhat crowded - the dining room isn't the largest in the world, and the tables are fairly closely spaced. That wouldn't really be a problem, but the food is just average in quality, not enough to make up for it. A few of the dishes seem to take the approach that "spicy is a flavor", which isn't really all that appetizing, and the portions are smaller then one might otherwise expect for the price. The service has been mixed - my boyfriend and I have given Su Hong a try on three different weekends. The first time, the service was fine; nothing to write home about but nothing bad either. The second time, things were really crowded and it was somewhat understandable the service was a bit slow, but it could have been better. The last time, we wound up waiting something like 10-15 minutes for our check to arrive after we had asked a waiter to bring it. Between the average-at-best food and the increasingly subpar service, we've decided to give Su Hong a pass in the future - we'll go to some place like the nearby Chef Chu instead.
Among all the places to eat on the El Camino Real in Palo Alto, this restaurant offers the best "To-Go" or "Carry Out" lunches.    I was happy when they moved over to our side of town from Menlo Park (closer to my work).  So far I have to compliment them on their healthy chicken salad for $5.25.      This is the small order but its way more than enough to satisfy my big appetite and stay within my calorie counting diet ( Its hard to lose weight when eating out ).    It has all the typical ingredients of lettuce, lean chicken breasts, crispy rice stick noodles, fresh cilantro, green onions, and toasted sesame seeds.    The house dressing and sprinkle of teriyaki sauce adds that special zing to the salad separating this dish from your boring American style cold salad. As of late, I've been doing my research on "Who has the Best Salt & Pepper Spare Ribs"?    Su Hong is on my list.     Yesterday's order was near perfect - right amount of dry herb batter to give it that added crunch, lean tenderized marinated pork, and added spices of jalapeno, sweet white onions, and roasted red peppers to give it that awesome kick.   One of my criterias - no bone is best.   It had a few rib bones but not much to distract me from my meat and texture test.   I counted five bones in my dish.   And that's pretty good considering that 95% was all meat. Honorable Mentions: - They use environmental friendly to-go trays.   My spare ribs came in an aluminum tray with a paper lid.   That's way better than using Styrofoam. - As always, I got my disposable chopsticks and fortune cookies with extra napkins.  It's no secret that most mom and pop Asian restaurants are cutting back on giving free chopsticks, sauces and napkins. - Parking is limited but not as bad compared to all the other to-go places on the El Camino Real (Palo Alto). - Accepts debit and credit cards. - The restaurant has two separate layouts:  the actual sit down restaurant side and the to-go order side. - And for the win (FTW).....  They're recognized as the CHINESE RESTAURANT FOR THE NEW MILLENNIUM 2000 by the Editiorial Stadd of Consumer Business Review.
I've never really been a fan of Su Hong's and have actually tried their Menlo Park location a few times.  Now, with a new location in Palo Alto on El Camino Real, I decided to give them another try for Chinese brunch. I'm a big fan of Chinese/Taiwanese brunch.  I love xiao long bao, love salty and sweet soybean milk, and love the other small dishes that come along with it. I can't help but feel a bit disappointed by our selection here.  Early brunch/lunch crowds were fairly thin, but they got to around 70% capacity by the time we left.  We were one of the first patrons at 11:30...perhaps I should have considered it a worrisome sign. Sweet soybean milk - sugar and soybean milk.  How hard can it be?  I found it not hot enough.  Please boil longer. Salty soybean milk - this is amazingly easy to make at home too.  My version is more tasty and I use all supermarket stuff.  I expect a restaurant to beat me. Xiao Long Bao - mediocre.  Again, the xiao long bao skins were thick, tasteless, and the meat flavor was non-existent.  Also, where's the soup?  I've made frozen xiao long bao better than these. Sweet buns, fried pastries - all were room temperature and exceedingly bland. Overall, Su Hong lacks the depth and "wok hay" that great restaurants have.  I'm probably using the latter word incorrectly as it commonly is used to describe wok fried items, but the fire and taste was simply missing.  It just is such an uninspired effort as if they are simply putting out the dishes and it's all lukewarm and bland, but some people still come. This is the Bay Area.  Our choices for Asian, especially Chinese cuisine are way too vast.   (Joy in Foster City, Shanghai Family in Mountain View, even Taipan and Hunan Garden)  You can do MUCH better than Su Hong unless they step up their game.  Too bad the location is so convenient. Anyway, still looking for a great Taiwanese breakfast place near Los Altos/Palo Alto.... Su Hong does take credit cards, including Amex.
We've been coming to Su Hong - and/or getting take out - with increasing frequency. The food has been consistently good and promptly served.  They also have a turtle in a fish tank that earns high marks from my munchkins. Su Hong earns its big points from me, however, for having been quite diligent in their handling of our food allergies.  We have both nut and egg allergies, so for us to be comfortable ordering, we need to talk with a strong English speaker, be convinced that person is familiar with all ingredients in each dish and believe their kitchen will actually accommodate our special order.  This is, to be understated about it, hard to come by at many restaurants and Chinese restaurants in particular.  But we've had probably a dozen different experiences at Su Hong wherein they helped us order and then made off-menu dishes (e.g., Fried Rice with no egg, Mu Shu with no egg, etc.) for us that did not, in fact, make my kids sick.  Yay! The menu is a bit pricey compared to some of the other Chinese restaurants, but if spending a bit extra gets my family a good meal that also keeps them safe, clearly that is money well spent.
After hearing how great their MP location is from my husband who grew up eating it, we went to the new PA location for my bday dinner with friends thus weekend. We made reservations for 8 people and were seated promptly, but it took asking twice and literally 27 minutes before we could even place a beverage order. Our waiter was very nice once we found him, but the food was truly marginal, and some of it was even bad. We will definitely not be going back.
All of the tin catering trays are near empty.  This is a sign of good food at a Wednesday lunch here at work. The chicken fried rice wasn't too oily.  Chinese chicken salad a perfect balance of lettuce, chicken and noodles.  I tried a little of everything and now I am feeling like I need go for a run tonight, weather permitting. Altogether a good experience however, I would like to experience the food in person.
Decent food and reasonable price.  Rating on items I've tried: potstickers - not bad spicy eggplant - not bad walnut prawns - ok Pork fried rice - ok, a little bland chicken chow mein - marginal dry braised green beans - pretty good chinese chicken salad - ok
This review is only for one item: Yummiest xlb (aka: steamed soup dumplings) I've had in the Bay Area. They are always super fresh, with tons of soup contained in a nice & chewy wrapper. My dad loves this restaurant-- we go so often that we can just walk in and they will start steaming an order of xlb for us. Delicious!
Great place, amazing food, lunch hour is super busy so it's a little hectic..
I had brunch here with my friend today and loved it.  Most of the food was great, but I had a couple issues with a few things.  The duck was cold and salty, which made it really good, but the pieces of bone in it bugged me a little.  The soymilk soup was amazing, especially with the fried dough we ordered with it.  The 'year rice cake' or whatever that comes with rice cake, pork, and some vegetables was good, but it was too sticky.  They definitely should have cooked it longer.  All-in-all, the food was good, I just wish they had brunch cocktails. The staff was very friendly and expedited our food.  Although our waitress really didn't speak English, I think I would have gotten by even though my friend speaks Chinese. The place was a little dingy, and that's really the only reason I'm knocking them a star.  Other than that, it was really good.
I'm surprised I'd not set foot in this place as long as I've lived in the area until recently. Finding food around here on late Sunday nights is extremely hard. We got in right before closing and they let us sit in the bar area. Was cool to see some Shanghai focused dishes. - Wu xi ribs in clay pot - Shanghai style won ton - Green Onion Lamb - Mongolian beef were all really solid. Good sized portions and the staff were still really friendly despite the fact that they were clearly trying to close up. I guess they were supposed to move to the old Denny's diner down the way but it got delayed somehow. Definitely will go back and try some of the other dishes.
Went here for dinner with a large group (think 30+; three large tables) after an event at Stanford. The food is more authentic than some of the nearby Chinese restaurants (they have a Chinese-only menu!), and my dining compatriots complimented the seafood soup and the meat dishes that came out. For the vegetarians in our party, we had a mixed vegetable dish (don't know the English name) that was so-so; it had pieces of bamboo and greens mixed together, but the combination was rather disappointing. The other vegetarian dish we had was the tofu in garlic sauce, which was also ho-hum. It was nothing spectacular and consisted only of fried tofu (dressed with scallions, etc.) in sauce - no vegetables or anything on the side. The red bean dessert, though, was excellent, and everyone else in our group seemed happier with the other dishes. Going with three stars here because it seems we lucked out with two mediocre dishes, and will probably give Su Hong another shot at some point.
"Uh excuse me?" "Excuse me waitress?" "Uh Hello?! Excuse me?" "WTF? Are they ignoring us?" Look,  I know we are just a party of two Caucazoids, but seriously, waiting on that refill and that check for longer than it took for us to eat our meal is RIDIC! The food was good. Hopefully this new branch will take a few customer service lessons from their Menlo Park site .
So... time for a new review of this place. I've avoided coming back ever since being decidedly unimpressed with their dinner menu when I moved in down the street 2 years ago. Despite ordering off the Chinese menu, the family style tofu was limp and bland and the sauteed green beans were ok but nothing special. I finally mustered up the courage to re-evaluate the place today... for weekend brunch/Northern dim sum, after seeing all these other people rave about their xiao long bao. So I went with the xiao long bao, the shao bing you tiao, the tian dou jiang and the zao ni su bing. First off, the xiao long bao. Not too shabby. Juicy and the pork filling was pretty good, though not as firm as I usually like it. At least it wasn't crumbly like how it is at HC Dumpling House these days. The skin was a little tough though, especially on the top of the bao. But, they gave black vinegar, which earns them some bonus points. Next, the shao bing you tiao. The you tiao themselves were excellent - light, fluffy and tasting like they were freshly fried. Very good with the sweet soy milk. The shao bing was ok taste wise, but pitifully small. The you tiao comes out as a pair of long sticks while an order of shao bing (one piece) is only big enough to hold half of a single stick. How am I supposed to eat my shao bing you tiao Taiwanese style when the bloody shao bing is munchkin-sized? Minus points for that faux pas. The sweet soymilk (tian dou jiang) was surprisingly good and much better than Chef Woo's (somewhat sacreligious, I suppose, but it's the truth). Last, but not least, was the date pastry (zao ni su bing). You usually only see the red bean version of this flaky dessert bun/pastry (which are also available here), so having a date-filled one is a big plus. Overall, I'd give their Northern dim sum 3 stars - some things definitely stand out. As for their dinner menu, I can only give them 2 stars. Definitely not my cup of tea. But I'll be back on weekends for brunch, partly because I live down the street. It's too bad that they're planning on moving (into the old Denny's on El Camino Real).
This time I went there with a big group. The food was average / mediocre, the service was rather lack of, I turn around and there was no one to call for service. the fish was rather expensive ($29.99) and it was small too. The rest of the dishes we tried were OK but more on the greasy side. We had "chives and eel", the eel tasted a bit fishy and the whole dish was oily and "sugary", somehow they like to put sugar in their dishes. we also had the "smoked pork with green garlic chives", the meat was thick and was not the typical Chinese style smoked pork, it was more like regular pork cut into slices, and it was in thick slices. The dish was also more on the sweet side.
I've been coming to Su Hong before this Palo Alto branch opened in 1990 or so (Menlo Park was the original).  In the ensuing years, I've pretty much come to the conclusion that 90% of their dishes kinda suck but the remaining 10% are to die for. The tip top of the 10% would of course have to be their CRISPY CHICKEN, a yummy fried flavorful specialty of theirs that comes with this really rad spicyish soy sauce.  Their other decent offering is Rolling Lettuce Chicken, a pretty intriguing taco-like contraption with white meat pieces and crispy fried noodles wrapped up in lettuce.  Their prices are kind of pushing it these days, though; most dishes suddenly hit $12 as of 2007. 2011 update: in a penny pinching move, Su Hong downgraded the aforementioned Crispy Chicken from half-white/half-dark meat dish to legs & thighs only, and the special sauce has turned mysteriously gooey.  In my book, that's enough to make this former one-hit wonder nothing special at all.
Great: Service Good: Clean, light, quiet, open space Spring rolls Decent: Vegetarian mu shu Vegetarian pot-stickers (I liked them, Zak R found them burnt)
If there was a 0 star option, I would for sure give Su Hong Eatery 0 star! Their food is cheating! We ordered stewed diced pork with beancurd skin in brown sauce. However, $7.95 only pays for about 10 small dices of pork, and HALF OF THEM ARE PURE FAT without any lean meat at all! This is a traditional southern-east Chinese dish using layered lean and fat meat, but not big chunks of pure fat! I tried to raise the issue to waiters. But I was unable to catch any waiter's attention for a few minutes. We had to start eating by picking those with lean meat. Finally (after about 10 min), I caught the attention of the woman who usually stands at the reception. I asked her how come half of the meat were pure fat. She said it was supposed to be like this. She said she would talk to the kitchen. But she never came back again. When we went to the counter to pay for the dinner, I told her again I was very disappointed with that dish. She said we should have raised the issue before we started eating. God, was I supposed to sit there without eating for 10 min until I catch any waiter? She again insisted that the dish was supposed to be like that. I didn't want to argue with her any more, and paid for the full amount without tips, because I was very unsatisfied with their food and service. Then the women said to me:"I DON'T WANT TO SEE YOU ANY MORE." Sure, I will NEVER go there any more!
I am a disabled person.  Finding restaurants with wheelchair or scooter ramps in the Bay Area has been difficult at best.  When I came upon Su Hong and saw they have  a full ramp I was estatic.  The hostess greeted me at the top of the ramp and opened the door for me.  They also allowed me to plug my scooter in to recharge while I was having my lunch. The food was phenomenol.  I had sizzling rice soup and the curry chicken with the rice pudding for dessert.  None of the dishes let me down.  There was no lingering aftertaste that you will sometimes get when eating chinese food.  The shrimp and mushrooms in the soup were fresh and made to order.  The curry chicken was well seasoned without being over powering.  Nice delicate balance of flavors overall. The dessert was very different from any rice pudding I have ever had.  I was not sure how my palette was going to handle the 'sticky' rice. However, the flavors, once again, very well managed, with a very nice 'sauce' that helped to break the sticky down as to make the rice flow in your mouth rather than stick to the roof of your mouth. Overall it was one of the most pleasant dining experiences I have ever had in a chinese reastaurant. Clean facility, friendly staff, superb services from the waiter, and yummy food.  The second best positive experience with this restaurant was their kindness and the care they took to making me very comfortable being a disabled person in their establishment. Thank you, Su Hong!
I've driven by this place hundreds of times and decided to give it a try tonight for take-out. Bad idea. BBQ Pork Won Ton Soup was okay (the broth was yummy, dumplings were okay but the pork tasted funny).  The Hunan Beef was awful.  Inedible; we threw it away.  The quality of the meat was terrible - there were no vegetables, the meat was tough and the flavor was just not good. We'll stick to Chef Chu which is a couple of blocks away and is a solid 4 stars.
Once, I used to live in Palo Alto.  I was in high school at the time.  It was pretty traumatic.  At any rate, we used to go to Su Hong a lot then.  We didn't know there was such a thing as good Chinese food. Unfortunately, while I have changed since then, Su Hong is still the same sort of mediocre Chinese food it once was, at a new location, taking over the space formerly occupied by the lovely and ever open Denny's.   It's still too expensive for what it is, the quality of the ingredients poor, and the service slow. If you want better American style Chinese food, go to Cafe Yulong ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ) or if you want real Chinese food, go to Fu Lam ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ) for Cantonese or Queens House ( http://www.yelp.com/biz/... ) for Taiwanese.  Whatever you do, just avoid Su Hong.
I live a brisk walk from this place but hadn't bothered to eat here for the longest time...until my parents took some friends there and they liked it. Not stellar, but pretty decent. Finally, I went there last night with my sister and her friends. My parents pre-chose the menu for us in chinese so we just took it over there. The food was pretty good and the prices were really reasonable. $6 for many of the dinner dishes, which would be $8 elsewhere. The place was packed with Chinese people, and my guess after reading about the other yelps, is that if you know what to order, it's good, and if you get stuff like kung pao chicken, you might be disappointed. We had stuff like Lion's head and also the Shanghai soupy buns which were good. Their diet coke was a bit uncarbonated. I'd rank it a very solid stand by / neighborhood place...not a place I'd drive miles to get to, but if I feel like putting my microwave in park on a thursday night, I wouldn't hesitate to head over there for a bite. [update 2008] AVOID THE TAKEOUT. Compared to the decent shanghainese stuff, this was inedible garbage. The appetizer sampler came with a vat of that sickly sweet red sauce that might have come with a Chung King dinner circa 1970. .My dad had a stomach ache all night. The pancakes that came with the mushu pork were like flaps of dead skin ripped from a blister.  Docking them one of their 3 stars...
The service here has always been great.  This place is a family favorite for take-out. However, I'm not the biggest fan.  The food is plain and not the most flavorful Chinese food around. 1 star for service and 2 stars for the food not being unbearably greasy.
humm, how should I start on this.... I was hoping it would be good, as there are good reviews on this place.  However, I was quite disappointed...  The service was slow and the food were below average... Xiao Long Bao - There is some juice but not really in the same level a  good XLB should be, and the skin is on the thicker & dry side Xiao Long bo with crab meat - there is some crab in it, but over powered by the pork Fish Fillet in hot bean sauce - a lot of pepper but acceptable spicy, but not a lot of fish eight treasures sweet rice pudding - this one looks pretty, but probably just not my type of dessert Chinese crape with red bean paste - decent but the crape needs to be more crispy I had other dishes too but not much worth mentioning..  Most of the dishes were also on the petite small size Also they really should control the ways dishes came out --Appetizer, main course, then dessert...   Most of the main dishes came out before the XLB did, and the other appetizer -pan fried bun was last to came out.  We tried to cancel it, as it seems they forgot about it but the waitress not so-politely refused.
Not sure what happened to the other reviewers but this place is better than what they reviewed. The food here is always good and tasty.  When we moved from the area, my wife's most frequent complaint was that no one made orange peel beef like Su Hong ... and she told me this weekly. I was happy to discover that the food was just as good when we moved back as it had been before we left. They're lightning fast at lunch which makes them a frequent stop during the work week.  The lunch menu features a nice combo that is way better than anything you'd get from a Panda Express outlet ... not that that's really saying too much. They also have a walk-up counter for take out.  They'll make you anything you want off the menu to-go without feeling like a dope for standing around a sit-down restaurant waiting for your take out.
I love this restaurant.  I wish I could go there right now.  We have definitely  had some misses but the successes far outweigh them.  What we love: Shanhai little won ton soup, Shanghai crunchy noodles, BBQ pork buns (something about all the carbohydrate goodness and sweetness of the pork is awesome!), and hte snow peas and shrimp. What we don't: shaved noodles, lion head in clay pot.  I just dont dig their clay pot dishes. Part of the fun for us is trying new dishes and adding more things to the "we love" list.  This is my favorite restaurant of the moment.
Kung Pao chicken?  Is that ever good?  Don't order that.  I'm with Russel H. on this one.  I don't know why people are so down on this place.  I've never had a bad experience here and I've been here a number of times. I've only, and probably will only ever go here for lunch on weekends.  The sweet soy milk with the Chinese donuts are a must have, so are those little Chinese pizzas.  I love the noodle soups and the pretty much every other dish I've had here.  It was better in the past, but their pot stickers and their soup buns are still very good.  I personally think the prices are cheap and reasonable and the food is tasty, so where's the love?
OMG, I went here this afternoon for lunch and we were addressed, I choose to call it addressed since the crap service we received from Gean was the $hits so its difficult for me to call it service. Right from the get go this crappy waitress had a major tude. Her face expresses the misery she's living in and her waitress skills are atrocious. After being seated we ordered the Chinese Chicken Salad. My bad...forgot to tell them no peanuts on the salad since I'm allergic to them. So the salad was brought out and my sister asked that we get another salad without peanuts and Gean gave my sister such as hassle about getting us another salad without peanuts. After that it took at least 10-15 minutes before this crap waitress brought us our simple chicken salad. I guess she was so pissed that she then made us wait. We finally got our food and I asked for a root beer soda. Again, took this miserable waitress another five minutes of back and forth when I finally asked again for my soda which she finally brought. Didn't want to make any waves with this poor excuse of a waitress cuz I was afraid she would go to the bathroom and pull a wild hair out her a$$ and drop it in our food if you know what I mean. I kindly asked her name before we left. My sister said she was not going to leave a tip cuz the service so was atrocious but I said no, I'm going to leave that crap waitress the tip she deserves so I waitress b-tch slapped her with a penny tip. As we were leaving I saw a waiter go pick up the tab and hand her the plate. They both look baffled, they pulled in another waiter continued looking at me with a confused look....yeah take that penny tip b-tch cuz that's what you deserve. Won't be eating here again. Will order chicken salad to go but no more eating in the restaurant, oh h-ll no! 1 star for the chicken salad -1 star: Gean the crappy waitress -1 star: Gean awful attitude -1 star: Gean's lag time -1 star: Gean's miserable looking face
Wow, wow, wow.! Every single dish we ordered was fantastic. I went with my Chinese friends who go there all the time and I was in food heaven. The menu is in chinese but I am sure it doesn't matter what you point at  it'll be great! Besides you can talk to the staff about selection. Highly recommend this restaurant, specifically in this location, heard the menlo park one is not the same.
This place has received consistently good review on various food board on the Internet and I finally have dinner there today. My dinner companion is from Shanghai and did most of the ordering. We have vegetarian goose, sauce duck, snow vegetable soup with fish and stir fry winter melon. The vegetarian goose is made of tofu skin, wrapped around tightly with some pieces of pickled vegetable. The whole tofu skin wrap is then cut into slices. This is not a faux meat dish, and does not pretend to be the real deal. However, the food is season well and is quite tasty. The sauced duck is a duck drum stick, again cut into slices and covered with a slightly sweet sauce. The duck is fatty, but does not taste greasy at all. I enjoy this dish very much. The winner in my opinion is the snow vegetable soup with diced fish. The soup has a thick soup base, with pieces of snow vegetable and diced white fish. It is very tasty and the snow vegetable and fish gives it saltiness and flavor. The stir fry winter melon is one of my favorite dish. Here the winter melon is cut into wedges of about 3 inches long and stir fried with dried shrimp and a light white sauce thicken with corn starch slurry. I think the winter melon can be cooked a little longer so that it is more soft, but that might be a personal preference. Total bill came to $26 before tips. In case others make the same mistake as me, Su Hong has another store in Menlo Park, across from Kepler, that serve a more "American-Chinese" menu.
Somehow I just paid $18 for a bucket of 'orange chicken' that was dry and had a strange chewy texture to it and also some 'shanghai style' green onion noodle that was some swiss chard, onions and breaded something or other on top of noodles that looked like they had been sitting in a fridge for a day.  they were all one noodle conglomerate.  \ That sucked.  Next time I"m stuck in a hotel here  I'll get in the car and see if I can find a panda express.  Very disappointing.
My wife and I just ate here for the first time. We'd been looking for authentic Chinese food in the area (without having to drive to Cupertino or Milpitas), and this fit the bill! The owner of this restaurant is Shanghainese, and the dishes reflect it. I'd say more than 60% of the customers in the restaurant were Mandarin-speaking Chinese, and everyone seemed to be enjoying their food. We had garlic-spicy eggplant (firm on the outside, tender but not mushy on the inside), a braised lion's head claypot, and river eel, plus Shanghainese vegetable rice. If this doesn't sound good to you, it might not be the restaurant for you - but if you're either Chinese or like authentic Chinese food, you should try it out! We ordered off of the Chinese menu - I'm not sure about the English menu, but the Chinese menu is teeming with tasty sounding options... The portions were also large. No need to make lunch tomorrow - leftovers will do just fine. We'll be back.
This place has a great menu. It has something for the authentic purist in your life and then there is food for the rest of us. The place is usually busy and loud so its not really the romantic hotspot. But the food is fast fresh and really tasty. My personal favorites are the Kun Pao chicken and the Mandarin Pressed duck. For lunch this place rocks!  If you eat there your food is ready in about 5 minutes or if your a to go person they put every thing in separate containers(like sauces and toppings) so when you actually eat it every thing is nice and crispy or fresh.
I live in Palo Alto, and with gas prices where they are, I'm searching hard for good local Chinese food (without having to drive south to Cupertino or north to San Mateo). I think Su Hong is one of the more authentic Chinese restaurants in Palo Alto.  You actually see Chinese families speaking Chinese dining here and one of their menus is in Chinese (note: the Su Hong in Menlo Park is more Americanized). Su Hong has a decent Chinese breakfast menu (soy milk, fried dough sticks, green onion pancakes, and shiao long bao - dumplings).  Sure the prices are not as cheap as those in Cupertino, but it saves me a drive, it tastes authentic (unlike most of the stuff in Palo Alto), and the staff is super nice. The stir fried knife cut noodles are good too.  The noodle soup does not have enough depth for my tastes.  My bf likes the spicy garlic fried tofu.  I'd like to try out their home style tofu and their "jing jian ro shi" (shredded pork in sweet sauce) dish.
Pretty good Chinese food and great service.  We were in a large dining room with a relatively small number of Asian families, but it's was a bit late for dinner. Huge portions, and probably the best scallops Ive ever had (including scallops at sushi places!); overall, a very good meal.  A little pricey ($50 for 2 people, lots of food, no alcohol), but given the quality of service and food, seems worth it. Hidden a bit behind Fuki Sushi on El Camino Way; they've got a large take-out counter, as well as the dining room, and their bar has a Ms Pac Man game, adding to the ambiance.
The first time we came here we ordered four dishes.   Three were okay and one was pretty tasty.  The second time we went we ordered three dishes (my wife has been ordering me to cut down on my food intake:) and all three were so-so. The food is okay if you're hungry, but there are better choices if you really want good Chinese food.
I would give a five star review if Su Hong brought back the Sunday Brunch they used to do. It really was marvelous with all you could drink champagne and Mimosas, Peking Duck and Whole peel and eat chinese shrimp cocktail. They also lose a point for changing their fried butterfly shrimp recipe, which USED-TO come wrapped in bacon before they were battered and deep fried, and were incredible with mustard. The new recipe is just ok. They get the three remaining stars for one dish, which I think is quite innovative and good, their Garlic Pine-nut Chicken. This dish alone is a five star. Bring back Sunday Brunch! It was the one thing that set this place apart!
The food they have here is really not Chinese food, both in terms of taste and price. It would cost me around $28 for a mongolian beef, a walnut prawns and small rice (take-out). These are the only two things I like from there. I'm really not crazy about the rest of the food I've tried. If you go into the main sit down restaurant, though, the service is really nice. And the only time we were there, the manager was very generous and offered us free soup and extra spring rolls. Overall, 3 stars for food and price, 5 star for restaurant service
OK update on my review- my boss likes this place so we order from here every now and then.  I've learned to stay away from the "chinese" plates and order from the appetizers menu. The dumplings are ok.  Kind of meaty in my opinion but some people like that.  I'm not much of a meat eater so I guess I'll stick to the veggie dumplings which are good.  The egg/chive dish is good- not too greasy or saucy.  I asked for less salt, since I got a bowl of salt for soup last time and they actually put in less salt!  I do have to say that their edamame bean curd dish is really good.  Next time, I'll have to order different appetizers or TW brunchy things too.
1/2 star rating. Grossness in a box. I ordered take out and it was delivered to our office. Yes, I... Read more 
Good Shanghai cuisine in Palo Alto.  I especially liked the Lion's Head in Clay Pot, which was better than other places I had had it. I also liked their Salted Duck cold cut, the wonton soup with Chinese spinach, and the stir-fried rice cakes.  The Xia Long Bao, on the other hand, was a bit lacking.  The skin is a bit on the thick and dry side, and the juice is not as flavorful and abundant as I like.
Came here for mother's day and it was CRAZY. We had reservations for 730 but didn't get seated til almost 8pm. But the food was worth the wait. Mother loves to complain about how outside food is so salty and sprinkled with MSG. But not a peep out of her! We ordered: shanghai dumplings-excellent-thin skinned with some nice soup inside. seafood soup-decent. crispy duck-excellent honey walnut prawns/shrimp-i have had better Seafood clay pot-excellent fresh veggies(i think snow pea leaf shoots/sprouts)-excellent While I absolutely can never get tired of canton style chinese food, this was a nice change of pace that was actually GOOD. The owner of this location is the creator/chef/inspiration of the su hong restaurants. So I assume this location is better than the one in menlo park. Just take a look at the chopstick wrappers-no cross promotion.
Most Notable: Tomato beef. Tangy, savory, and lightly sweet, its perfectly balanced. The best tomato beef I've had, and I've had plenty. 875 Most Overrated: Their infamous pinenut chicken. Its decent, but I wouldn't get it again. The chicken salad is also very typical, slivered fried chicken breast, noodles, and a white pepper salt blend with sesame.
Little guy has been cranky today. Nights like this makes me so glad there are Chinese delivery. The only delivery I know of from my hometown was pizza and it was either Dominos or Pizza Hut...wait, except this one place that delivered pizza and sub-sandwiches. Anyhoo, here's what we tried at Su Hong... Drunken Chicken :: I've always been curious about this dish that I heard about often enough in Chinese series. When I saw it on the Su Hong menu I couldn't pass up the opportunity to try it. They used the yellow-skinned chicken; meat tends to be more flavorful and chewy compared to the "normal" chicken. It looked like poached/steamed chicken. Roughly chopped/sliced. Swimming in what looks to me a broth. The smell of alcohol rushed at me when I peeled the lid back. Its potency stung my eyes and overwhelmed my olfactory receptors. "Oh wow." *squint eyes and turn away* I hesitated for a moment before I picked out the smallest piece I could find and popped it in my mouth. Woo. The bitterness from the alcohol made me thought I was eating cough medicine. Unconsciously I squinted my eyes shut, crinkled my nose, and gulp it down. A chaser would've been nice. Indeed, the chicken was very much so drunken. Szechuan Beef Stew Hand-Shaved Noodle Soup :: Anything made from scratch always intrigues me. It's rare to find places that serve noodle that aren't pre-made or came from a package. Couldn't pass up this opportunity. I heard of "hand-pulled" noodle but never "hand-shaved" noodle. The broth and beef stew is very similar to any Asian beef stew; probably tomato-based with star anise and/or five spices. The beef was fatty and tender. Got a few sprigs of spinach and slices of celery. The noodles are one-inch wide and as thick as one and a half sheets of lasagna strip. Its firmness also reminds me of lasagna. Too thick and firm for my liking. It doesn't have much bite in it so it seems kind of "dough-y." They didn't separate the noodle and the soup so the noodle probably got soggier than it should be. Salt & Pepper Fish Filets :: Fried lightly-battered fish filet tossed in sliced onions, jalapenos, and dried red chili peppers. Very tender and flaky. Not too oily or salty. Not spicy at all if you just eat the fish. Imperial Pork :: Fried battered boneless pork juliennes tossed in a sweet-and-sour-like sauce but more sweet than sour. Chinese Squash with Dried Shrimp :: Si Gua or Luffa stir fried. Light and savory. A bit oilier than my liking but still tasty. Delivery was very prompt. They quoted us 30-40 minutes but arrived at our door in more like 15-20 minutes. Well, they're only 10 blocks or so from us. There was a $4 delivery fee. Our order was around $50 not including tax, delivery fee, and gratuity. Not too bad for the number of dishes we got but not exactly worth the money either. Portion was on the smaller side. Overall, not bad.
The only high end chinese food place I like to go, nice sit down but the new building they have now is alittle too bright and cramped. Waiter service is slow and food is slow to come out, but yummy food overall.
Disclaimer: I'm not Chinese, and the dishes that I ordered were pretty standard Americanized-Chinese food fare. (I didn't order any of the Shangai-style specialties.) I thought the food was mediocre. Chef Chu's is a lot better. The lady at the take-out counter was awesome. She put a smile on my face.
I went there once in June for lunch. One Chinese waitress was very rude. She confronted us because she was not happy with the tips we left. She even asked if we would come again given the consequence of it. Nah, I guess I will never come again.
Just ok.  I come for the faster service, easy lunch time parking, lower prices, not so much for the food....  Hey, this is palo alto, you can't expect much  asian dining.  It's either this or something equally bad but with worse parking.
Good taste of northern cooking.  Their lionhead dish is the resturant favorite.  Very well done.  The meatball combination of beef and pork was mixed well enough so it had some of the "snap," attributes (kinda like a hot dog).  The sauce was done well with a good brown sauce with napa cabbage. We also tried the fried bun.  It had a good milky taste and a great consistency.  The oil was very clean and it produced a golden brown skin.  The sweeten condense milk accompaniment truly made it very northern style cooking.  Some of other dishes were the knife cut noodles (alittle over salted) but nicely cooked and stir fried snow pea (very nicely cooked). -1 star because it didn't really have anything extra special.  It was just good ordinary cooked food.
An excellent alternative for your Americanized Chinese food (i.e Panda Express).  Big portions, good lunch spot if you're hungry, food isn't too greasy. I went here with my coworkers for lunch and I ordered the Kung Pao Chicken Combo meal.  They gave a giant heaping portion of chicken, fried rice, and chow mein, ie your typical Americanized Chinese food fare.  They were thoughtful enough to put the peanuts on the side.  It was so huge that I ended up having lunch for 2 days, granted I'm a girl with smaller frame. Here are my impressions: Ambiance: Hole in the wall, not too much seating, more of to-go spot Food: Su-Hong has relative big menu with your average Americanized Chinese food like Orange Chicken, Broccoli Beef, Kung-Pao Chicken, Mu-Shu Pork, etc.  There lunch combos come in big portions that should fill even the most starving man. Be conscious though that their fried rice comes with pork so make sure to tell your friends who are Indian or Kosher. Price: Lunch Combos are $6.95+ Would I come back?  I would definitely come back here for a big lunch with my coworkers since the prices aren't too bad considering how much food you get.
I went to the Su Hong Eatery for the first time for dinner. I ordered take-out and needless to say it was some of the worst Chinese food I have ever had. I ordered the Orange Chicken it was rubbery, bland and lacked any sort of memorable flavor. I was barely able to taste any orange in it. I also ordered Chicken Fried Rice, which was also incredibly bland. I was thoroughly disappointed with my meal and was even tempted to take it back and ask for my money back. I would recommend *not* eating here if you have any sort of food appreciating pallet.
Well, I totally forgot about this place for over a year, until my husband reminded me of it last weekend.  So a few friends, my husband and I ordered our typical favorites...westlake beef soup, spicy pine nut chicken, Su Hong beef, xiao loong bao's, and even beef chow fun.  Sure, you might think everything we ordered is all Asian American style foods, but since 60% of us were Chinese, we still loved their food.  Su Hong is generally leisurely dining, where we stopped by for lunch around 1:30 and stayed until about 4pm (they are technically closed btwn. 3-4 so their employees catch a break and do the lunch to dinner shift, but in no way did they shove us out the door.)  These owner and the staff are very friendly and I find that their food has been very consistent even though I haven't been over a year. Come to think of it, I think we stopped considering the place because many of our friends are allergic to MSG.  But when I inquired about the use of MSG this weekend, the server pretty much said it was only the more authentic Asian dishes are the ones that have MSG, but everything we ordered didn't have any.  Good enough for us!  Plus, their prices are still reasonable, and it's always fun to eat family style, so then you get a taste of all the different dishes. One time we had a bunch of out of town guests in town, so we gathered a bunch of family and friends (roughly a group of 40 people), and David helped us plan the menu to ensure there was enough food for all of us.  The portions were large enough that we had a lot of leftovers that we sent home with all the folks who lived locally.   Always enjoy going here.
Su Hong has moved next to the Cabana Hotel on El Camino. They are across the street from Trader Vic's in the old Denny's restaurant. I went to eat there when they first opened after the move (about 2 months ago) and it was packed. I hope they change their information for those who want to go there. I'm only giving them two stars because I don't think the old food was terrific. I hope it's improved.
Simply put, the food wasn't good. We ordered Dinner "B" for 3 because it had a great selection of dishes at a good price. The best dishes were merely OK and the rest were not good at all. The Lemon Chicken was downright bad. I've occasionally had a dish at a Chinese restaurant that I didn't like but this was the first time ever in my life I didn't like any of the dishes. I will not be returning here. Some positives: The service was very friendly (though not without flaws... food started coming out before our drinks) and the restaurant was very clean and had ample parking.
I came here with a party of 4 and we ordered their 4 person dinner combo, which came with a lot of dishes and way too much food.  The stand-out dish was the shanghai style sweet and sour pork ribs, which were tender and flavorful.  All the ingredients seemed fresh, although they did use a lot of oil for most of their dishes.  I had about 5 other dishes, but nothing else really stuck out in my memory.  The place is decent and offers pretty standard chinese food...nothing extraordinary going on here.
Terrible Customer Service!! They estimated 20 minutes for delivery and took over 2-HOURS!!  They did not call or apologize. When the driver finally arrived he tried to get me to take the food and started negotiating. By that time we were ready for bed and the night was ruined. There is no excuse for this type of service.
Su Hong is our favorite Chinese restaurant in Palo Alto, a city with many good places to eat. Though not a cheap restaurant, the entrees are well made and seem to be tailored to the customer.  We have seen large parties of Asians being served items we could not find on our English language menus.  Admittedly we order Chinese-American style dishes - sweet and sour pork, chicken chow mein, chicken salad, etc. The chicken salad is the best I have had.  The chicken is deep fried then sliced and chilled before being added to lettuce, fried mung bean noodles, cilantro, green onions, and chopped peanuts.  It is topped with a very light sweet/sour dressing.  A small salad is $10 but is ample for two. Expect to have good quality food and pleasant service but not low prices at Su Hong's.
Su Hong Eatery in Palo Alto is very different from Su Hong in Menlo Park.  Yes they sound similar, and they are both owned by the same person, but each place is geared towards a different clientele.  If you want Americanized Chinese food, head over to Su Hong in Menlo Park. Su Hong in Palo Alto is the place for some authentic Chinese food.  They specialize specifically in food from Shanghai.  Definitely order off the Chinese menu, and if you can't read Chinese bring someone who can.  My personal favorites are the dumplings and anything with duck.  I think they still are one of the best places in the Bay Area for some authentic Chinese food.
Good Su Hong Style Chinese food.  Not so salty. Ask for Yan-Du-Xian soup :)
Given no competition in Palo Alto, Su Hong is my favorite Chinese restaurant in the neighborhood. It's a little pricey compare to similar eatery in Cupertino or Milpitas but that's what you pay for PA.
I started eating at this place about 23 years ago and find it to be some of the most delightful Chinese food ever. Some of the dishes that have kept me returning all these years are the Chicken Salad, BBQ Pork w/Broccoli Chow Fun, Frogs Legs --- if you like frogs legs this is the place for you, Prawns & Scallops w/Lobster Sauce "scrumptious", Sizzling Rice Soup is always fun and full of flavor. You just can't make a mistake with what ever you order. It doesn't stop with the menu, what ever your preference is, they will custom create and prepare most anything you desire. A full service bar is ready to serve you strong drinks, and they have a tasty happy hour spread Mon.-Fri. within the bar area. They also offer a take-out area that is great for lunches and reasonably priced.  Good stuff here, don't miss it!
I came here more than one year ago and decided not to come again. But, in a recent gathering, a friend suggested to have dinner here. I followed the group, hoping that it would improve.  Once again, I was disappointed. What we arrived, there were 2/3 full of tables occupied with Americans - not a good sign for an authentic Chinese restaurant. I do not want to eat Chinese food tailored to American favorite deep drying and sweet-and-sour. The braised fish tail smells like dirt. Xiao-long-bao (small container dumpings) are costly but the taste does not live up to the price. The Wuxi ribs are tasteless with too much grease. It is our mistake when we ordered Mushu. I know it is cooked to American's taste, but did not know that it can be so horrible. It should be renamed to chop-suey. By the time we were about to finish, there were more Chinese patrons. Perhaps, there are no good restaurants in Palo Alto areas for them to choose from. Some of them look young and are probably working at facebook or google and the like. They are among the new middle-class too young to appreciate authentic Chinese food. The worst is the owner's attitude. Three ladies at our table did not have any rice. But, the owner insisted to charge $1.25 for rice per person for everyone at the table. $3.75 is not a big amount. But, her indifferent looks and disparaging remarks made me think why she was so arrogant. The waiters were not professional either. You waived to them and they pretended not seeing you. One waiter stood watching, picking his nose. Hey, if Suhong wants to be serving to affluent guests at such steep prices, they've got to conform to standards of upscale restaurants. The only star is given to the Mexican bus boy. He is the only one working diligently and nicely. Of course, if anyone suggests to go to Suhong again, I will excuse myself.
Decent chicken fried rice and lot of quantity for the price (~$5).
Love there General Chicken
Maybe I came here on an off day or just ordered the wrong thing.  Other Yelpers seem to like their food a lot.  I ordered their almond chicken lunch special.  It comes with hot & sour soup, chow mein, and fried rice which came to $9.  The soup was missing both the hot and sour components.  The chicken was good, not fantastic.  Our server looked annoyed when we asked her to split it 3 ways on each of our cards.  I actually prefer Hunan Homes down the street which has a lot more lunch special selections.
This is a wonderful Chinese restaurant, I came for lunch with a friend from work and I must say I was pleasantly surprised. Since this was lunch we just wanted a light meal and opted to share the beef with snow peas and the sauteed snow pea greens with garlic which of course was accompanied by steamed rice. The snow pea greens are the leaves of the snow pea plant and are delicious when sauteed with garlic, this dish did not disappoint. We both found ourselves clamoring for second helpings of the beef with snow peas, it was so savory and delicious. The beef was perfectly cooked and so tender you could cut it with your fork, while the snow peas still retained a bit of crunch and were delectably sweet tasting. Prices are extremely reasonable and this was a delicious lunch enjoyed with wonderful company.
This place is one of my favorite Chinese places to eat. I have only eaten off the Chinese menu so I can't critique the American menu. I come here ofen with my husband and Chinese In-Laws and they have the best red bean dessert and xiao long bao.
Food isn't spectacular, prices aren't the best, but food is good enough for me. They have more authentic Chinese dishes and also the Americanized-Chinese dishes so it caters to both audiences. I like this place and it should be more of a 3.5
This place floats between 3 and 4 stars because the food is always hit or miss.  My family and I have been getting take out Chinese from Su Hong for many many moons, and within the last 5 years the quality has gone on a roller coaster ride.  We each have our own dishes that we like or are accustumed to, but they vary so much from order to order that we have begun looking for other Chinese places because we can't deal with the inconsistency. They do lunch specials, that come with noodles fried rice and your dish for about 10 buck or so, but said specials used to come with an egg roll and some soup, but I guess those got the axe and the price stayed the same.  I usually go for the more American style Chinese dishes here; your Generals chicken and Lemon Chicken and Hunan Beef or whatever, but their new menu (and new location) has a bunch of enticing looking dishes that at least sound a bit more authentic.  Either way I eat here all the time, I just wish that each time I order something I don't need to pray to the gods of consistency that the food is as I remember.
Honestly, I am not the pickiest eater of all time, but this place did not exceed any of my low standards on chinese food. Most of the time,I go to chinese food restaurants, expecting nothing! I expected this place to be better than I imagined. However, I was wrong! Yes, when I am in the south bay, I am not looking for the authentic chinese cuisine, I would get in SF. Instead, I want my chow mein, fried rice, and kung pao chicken or such. I am disappointed I wasted my time and money, when I could have went to Mr. Chaus, saved money and had the SAME quality food! I must admit, the service was great, and that's why I gave it three stars. 2 stars for service and 1 star for food!
Su Hong is good if you want decent food fast which is the case most of the time for me. Although most people would claim this place is Amercanized, I believe they still have some authentic Chinese blood in it even if it's just a drop. Even with the sweet and sour or lemon [insert meat here], they still have green onion pancake, the little steamed meat dumplings, and various traditional canto/mandar dishes. Obviously, this is not where you want to go to enjoy solid Chinese but it's fast and edible.
As you can tell by its name, the dishes here are from the Suhong/Shanghai area.  Obviously, if you are looking for cantonese dishes, this is not the right place.  Having said that, the trick is knowing which dishes to order.  First of all,  I always order from the Chinese menu (the one with no English translation).  Secondly, I always stick to the typical Shanghainese dishes like xie fen xiao long bao (juicy dumpling with crab filling), shang hai cu chao mien (stir fried Shanghainese thick noodles), jiu niang xiao yuan zi (sticky rice balls in rice wine), etc. I lived in China for 10+ years, and am pretty picky about my Shanghainese food. I actually think this place is pretty decent.  Perhaps, the people who gave this place bad reviews just ordered the wrong dishes.
My brother and I had dinner at Su Hong with visitors from mainland China.  We had the dry braised fish, sweet spareribs, a sizzling beef dish, seafood soup, stir-fried winter melon, and a few other dishes I can't remember.  All tasted pretty authentic (confirmed by our dining companions) and were easy on the salt and MSG.  We did order in Chinese from a separate menu, so your mileage may vary with the standard menu.
I've never had a meal that makes me rethink my taste for an entire cuisine, until now.  Honestly, I wasn't expecting an epic meal, nor a 4-star taste sensation, just a simple, satisfying, take-home chinese food dinner with leftovers for a couple of days.  What I got was a disturbing shock to the senses and leftovers that will only make it to the dumpster.  How do you screw up Kung Pao chicken?  Make it with seemingly undercooked tiny, chewy, crunchy(?!) bits of chicken waste parts.  The BBQ pork was all but inedible, not quite sure how to best describe the odd flavor, perhaps I shouldn't try.  Vegetable fried rice, a no brainer right?  Wrong, way more egg than rice, and not quite fried/cooked enough.  When a fried wonton is the best part of the meal, then it's pretty much over for me.  I didn't even want to touch the fortune cookies for fear of the messages contained therein.
Had delivery tonight. The lady on the phone said it would be 30 minutes, it took an hour and 10 minutes. The food was cold, including the hot and sour soup. We ordered Orange chicken, which in my opinion was flavorless, sweet and sour pork which was over fried and bland. The pork fried rice was dry and the beef chow mein was the only edible thing we ordered, after reheating of course. To top it all off this place was completely over priced, we paid $60 after tax and the completely unnecessary $2 delivery charge.
I use do take-out from this place a lot when I lived in Mountain View.  The food here is good.  It consist of some Americanized item and some authentic Chinese items.  I have been here on luncheons with my Chinese co-workers and with my Caucasian co-workers on separate occasions and this place did not disappoint at all.  The service is so-so and the parking is good.
For a place that looks curious (and probably even suspicious, with old white people hanging out at the bar), they have pretty damn juicy "xiao long baos" and the food is pretty tasty. We came here for dinner and learned that for lunch, you get so much more for much less $$. Next time, I'm going to try a lunch.
The rave recommendations from friends are always welcome but don't always follow through. In this case, I have wanted to try Su Hong after hearing major accolades for their Menlo location. W/O a reservation, we were able to get seated before the dinner rush but once seated we didn't see a waiter for a good 20 minutes. Tea was emptied and waters were drained. Obviously wait staff are in short supply at the new location. Once we were able to place our order the food did come relatively quickly. Pot stickers - crispy and yummie Szechuan shrimp - good Crispy chicken in hot sauce (yelp recommendation) - ok, not great Long green beans w/ chicken - good Beef Chow fun - ok Bill - Outrageous!! Sorry, but for $20 per person the quality of the food should be a little more memorable and 1 waiter should not be servicing the entire restaurant... for the recommendation I will be going to PF Chang's where we were supposed to go originally.
Potstickers (meat) - have had much better elsewhere. Thick dough layer Mongolian beef - not bad Kung pao chicken - bit too spicy. Overall food more oily than I like. Portions were large. Delivery was quick
My family ordered off the Chinese menu there - the one not available to foreigners (i.e., non-Chinese) -  and the food we ended up with tasted pretty terrible.
This place was pretty bad and pricey for crappy Asian food. The waitress recommended everything on the menu which I felt was an indication that everything here is crappy therefore she doesn't want to recommend anything specifically. We did get another waitress to make some suggestions. We ordered the sizzling soup which was okay. We had the tofu clay pot which was okay. The restaurant was kinda dirty, i guess this place fits the stereotypical "dirty chinese" except it's not good.
The dishes are good but a bit pricey.  The service from the front desk is so so.
XLBs were pretty good here.  We got the family menu for 10 with only 7 adults eating, it was way TOO MUCH food, they really should have warned us, as we came out carrying 4 huge plastic bags of takeout containers.  They talked us into ordering their famous lion's head meatballs with crab meat which was also pretty good.  Their dishes were so called typical shanghainese style food.  Nothing wowed me, but nothing tasted bad either.
The food here is not bad...just ok...I went there with my in-laws and we ordered several dishes.  The best one was probably the shanghai dumplings :)  It was packed during lunch but we were still able to just walk in and sit down without waiting very long.
Food is mediocre. Place is kind of dirty. Prices are a bit high. Ate here once, and only once.
We used to get Su Hong's as a change of pace in college.  Like the other reviewer said - the orange peel beef is what to order ... the other items aren't really all that great.  I've never eaten in at Su-Hong's either ... only delivery.
Very good Chinese food. I'm not into American Chinese food, so didn't have any of that...but the rice cake dish with pork and mustard greens was really good, along with the chicken clay pot, and a really spicy soup with beef and greens. I think my favorite of the three was the chicken. Really good...I think it was also really good prices for the large portions. I'll definitely be going back!
Been here a few times, mostly take-out.  The take-out menu is fairly typical but there are some gems on it.  The pinenuts chicken and three mushroom chicken were good.  They do have a Chinese menu for those who can read it.  The few things I ordered on there tasted pretty good but they didn't seem too fresh.  The restaurant also seems a bit run-down.
The siu lung bao was very good.  We also the drunken chicken, Chinese ham and a chopped up vegetable with bean curd cold dish.  They were all good.   We did not get a chance to try their other dishes but its looking good so far.
I love to get take-out from here. I don't claim to know jack about authentic Chinese food, but the vegetables are nice and fresh, not overly sauced and the staff is super efficient. I really want to have a drink at the bar that looks so oddly out of place :)
Have been there twice for big group lunch and dinner.  Really love their drunken chicken.  Authentic Shanghai style.  Pine nut fish is also superb.  Love their dessert (Glutinous Rice Balls and Osmanthus in Fermented Rice Wine, is it the right translation?).  Haven't had it anywhere else.  Absolutely love the osmanthus flavor!!  IMHO, that is the best Shanghai style restaurant in the neighborhood.
I have been eating at Su Hong for almost 15 years and this place is consistently delicious. Some nights the service can be a bit slow but the food is worth the wait! They also have some items that aren't on the menu but will make for you if you ask. Highly recommend this place.
good decent chinese food for PA.  love the steamed dumplings, green pea sprout. Also has some good shanhainese style dishes like sauteed shrimp, bread, etc.  Service is quick and clean.  Has good variety of banquet style menus if you come with a big party. of note, they have just moved to their new location onto El Camino Real where the Denny's used to be.
decent place. the lunch specials are great. but my favorite part about today's visit is how polite and jolly the service was. i walked in, and the gentleman greeted me right away with a smile: "hello, how are you today?" he said it with such a brightness, i wouldn't have been able to hold back a smile even if i were in the worse mood ever.
Everything was good except for the lemon chicken. DO NOT GET THAT. I loved their version of the hot and sour soup, and their shanghai style fried rice cake and bbq pork fried rice. Their mu shu wraps are soft but also hold the pork and moisture in. The first courses came out quickly while the latter courses took a lot longer, but service was good. They were attentive with filling up the water glasses...then again we were the only ones there so i would certainly hope so! None the less, i would come back here again. Have had better but good enough for this area.
My last experience with this restaurant was so bad that I decided not to go there again. It was a holiday evening and my husband and I were planning to go to a movie at around 7 pm. So we arrived at Su Hong at about 5:30 pm, and tried to have a quick dinner. The waitress looked a little unhappy after she saw that our order was only about $25 (since we only had about 30 min for dinner). We didn't explain our plan to her but were thinking of leaving a bigger tip when we leave. However, while we were waiting for the food, we heard the waitress complaining to the male manager (or a senior waiter) that we didn't order much food. She didn't "whisper" since we could hear her from 5 tables away. We thought it was very unprofessional and rude of her to say that loud. But this is not even the worst! While we were eating our food, the same male manager came to our table, interrupted us and asked us whether we wanted to order more! (Not the kind of nice question like "how do you like the food?" or "let me know if you need anything else") Are you serious? If you require a minimum purchase on a holiday night, post it on your door so that we wouldn't have stepped in. At this point, our holiday mood was half ruined. In order to maintain the other half, we paid the bill with 20% tip and left as fast as we could. BTW, this happened while there were only 2-3 tables of guests in the whole restaurant including ours and most waiters/waitresses were standing idly. So I don't think we used too much resources of the restaurant and paid too little. Even if the restaurant was busy at that time, we do not deserve this type of treatment.
I love this place.  It's the standard by which I measure Chinese food.  Very good, authentic and great staff
Great lunch box specials!  Great portions and they deliver!
I love suhong, but this particular suhong sucks!! We went there during lunch time and well its located where Dennis use to be, maybe that should of been a red flag from the beginning but i neglected it. The food did not taste like suhong, dont know, it did not taste like chineses the soda i was given had no sparkling, but she swore that it was a can that had jsut been opened she did not replace it even after i said it was not taste... Good thing we are low maint, becasue that lady did not show her face at my table unless i asked her. BAD service and then When I did not leave a tip because of the bad service she said somehting about the America way is to leave 15% tip, was she joking or on crack!! I am a great tipper, but not when the service sucks and you expect me to pay you if you did not deliver. anyway NEVER again will I eat at this Suhong. If you are going to go to a Suhong go to the one in Menlo Park!! on Menlo Ave for pick up or the restaurant around from them.. Man they are delicious and addicting too I think I am a VIP there.. Good luck on your eating adventures!!
This is hands down my favorite Chinese restaurant! Their "General's Chicken" is the NECTAR OF THE GODS!!! The fried rice is great too!
My husband and I went to this restaurant for dinner yesterday. We ordered "Xiao Rong Bao", "Dong Po Rou",  Sea Food  Toufu, a Fish and a vegetable. As Singaporeans, both my husband and I found the food tasty and terrific. One of our friends who just came to US from Shanghai, said that the dishes taste authentic. Service is great as well. The staffs are very attentive. The place offers just right feel and food with just the right taste.
The worst Chinese food and service ever!! My daughter and I waited 1/2 hour and had to ask for someone to please take our order.  Our order arrived one serving at a time. We were so hungry we filled up on the fried rice, when we finally got the szechuan chicken it was rubbery and looked like odds and ends of chicken with a sauce that tasted like something out of a jar.  We proceeded to tell the waitress that we were not satisfied with this dish and should not have to pay for it.  After that we were treated even worse.  We felt robbed of our time (nearly 2hrs) for such poor service.  My first and last time ever and will never recommend this place to anyone.
I tried this place once based on someone's recommendation and I want my money back. The food is very very oily, the dumpling (which supposedly is its signature dish) has no juice. Maybe my batch was an anomaly but come on, it should be better than that. And finally, it is really expensive. For the money I paid and the portion they have it's not worth it. I'm very disappointed.
I went to this restaurant for dinner on a regular weekend evening.  I frequent Chinese restaurants and I consider Chinese food to be a delicious genera of food.  In fact, besides BBQ, Chinese food is my favorite type of food.  With that said, I did not like the taste of Su Hong's food, and I would not eat there again simply because of the taste. The good aspects of my dining experience was that Su Hong was affordably priced compared to other Chinese restaurants in the Bay  Area, and the staff were friendly.  Unfortunately, I thought that the food was not seasoned well and was too greasy.  I am asthmatic, and I actually had an asthma attack after eating there because of the amount of grease in the food.  There are several better tasting Chinese restaurants in the area that I would recommend going to in lieu of Su Hong, such as Chef Chu's and Hunan Garden.
The Menlo Park location is excellent, this one is not so great.  Had dinner there one night with a group, and the food quality is not as good as Menlo Park and the service is not as stellar either.  Ordered lunch take out the other day.  It was very slow.  Also, if you order lunch at the restaurant it comes with soup and egg roll.  But, if you order to go, soup is an additional $1 and egg roll is $0.50.  I can see charging for the soup, since they pay for a container, and not many people want soup to go anyways, but they should include the egg roll just as if you were dining in
Sometimes, the simplest of flavors can lead to the most memorable food experiences. Mine happened today at Su Hong. We had: XLB- succulent beasties filled with delicately flavored pork and broth. Served with black vinegar and generous portions of ginger. Mmmmmm.) easily one the best dumplings I've had. Certainly beating the ones I've had at Loon Wah, which is pretty up there in terms of dumpling-ness. vegetarian goose- Again, good stuff here. The delicate layers of wrapping provided a counterpoint to the earthy mushroom encased within. DanDan noodles-  strongly flavored- very hot chili peppery with a hint of soy sauce salty. Very satisfying starchy complement to the vegetables. Now... the vegetables.! The highlight of the evening. (The BF and I had the chinese squash with soybeans and pea greens with shrimp.)- They were fresh and vibrant- flavored with just a hint of whatever it is that makes the flavor of the vegetables stand out . The squash was smooth and buttery, with an al-dente (not crunchy!) bite to it. The beans were edamame taken to the next level. The pea greens were vibrantly flavored with just a hint of garlic- again, with that signature al-dente bite that makes you want to take bite after bite after bite. Lastly- dessert (on the house! woot!) We had fried banana in a crispy batter deep-fried and topped with whipped cream and maraschino cherries. It looked so good- I couldn't say no to it- even if I'm already stuffed. It was slightly sweet the way hot steamed bananas are. The crisp batter slightly softened by the cream made for some comforting tummy-rubbing, rib-sticking sighing. So yeah... BF and I are extremely happy campers. Plus points too for being one of the very rare PA places that serves authentic-tasting delicious food. Su Hong, you definitely rocked my boat tonight! (PS Some of you haters who got turned off by their kung-pao americanized chinese food should try their shanghai specialties. )
In the first few months when the Jade Palace is replaced by Beijing Duck, this was my favorite Chinese restaurant in Palo Alto neighborhood. At least it's my first choice for large(~10ppl) friends gathering. But this only lasted for half a year and I get so bored of it. Everything seems good, but nothing really special that makes you wanna come again. And this place is a little bit pricey for me.
Minus one star for having the same name as Su Hong in Menlo Park.  I actually went there first and when I realized they didn't have the XLB (shanghai dumplings), I left!  To their credit, they were ultra-nice and didn't charge us for tea.  As for Su Hong Eatery on El Camino in Palo Alto, I enjoyed it.  I had high expectations after reading about the shanghai dumplings on here, and I'd say they were mostly met.  As is usually the case, they tasted even better once they had cooled down a little.  I wished they had been served with red vinegar, though.  On the plus side, the time they took to cool meant they were ultra-fresh.  We also ordered the Lions Head, which is essentially a huge pork meatball with vegetables in broth.  I liked it more than I thought I would - I likened the meat to what is put in potstickers and though that could be gross as a huge hunk of meat, it somehow wasn't.  We also got the orange peel beef (I forget if that's the exact name), and it was pleasantly crispy yet well-coated in sauce.  I'd go back, but probably stick to the shanghai dumplings since they were my favorite.  Yum!
i've been a faithful follower for about the last 8 months or so.  it's the benchmark i measure all other chinese restaurants against now.  i've never had a bad dish, never had bad service - in fact, never had an issue at all, even when ordering especially bland dishes for the munchkins in my household. i especially enjoy their hot and sour soup (the best i've ever had, really) and their pine nut chicken.  oh, and their pot stickers too - they get them just right. if you order to go, don't be freaked out by the turtles.  yeah they may smell a little, but they're cool in a WTF kinda way.  plus they aren't snappy.  yes, i know from experience. all in all, su hong is more expensive than most of their competitors, but you're getting what you pay for and they're so worth it. savoriffic.
I've been going to the Su Hong's in Menlo Park for years. And I used to order food from them for office lunches, etc. I went to the the Palo Alto restaurant the other night for the first time. The food was still delicious, and the service was fast. But what brought down the rating for me was the price. We were a party of two, so we chose the "small" serving for our dishes. Don't get me wrong... with soup, two dishes and rice, the amount of food we got was just right. No leftovers. But I was dismayed to see that the "small" dishes I ordered were priced $9.25 (Salt & Pepper Fish Fillet) and $7.25 (Eggplant in Garlic Sauce) each, which in other Chinese restaurants would have been a full-sized dish already. I mean, the small dish was the size of a dessert plate! And not filled to the brim even. So lukewarm feelings for me this time... food was good, tummy was filled just right, but my pockets felt empty afterwards.
sizzling rice soup is really good. everything else is really good too. huge portions and very well prepared. been coming here for years, anytime i crave some good chinese.
authentic!
Located on the border of Palo Alto, Mountain View and Los Altos, Su Hong offers relatively cheap Americanized Chinese food but with higher quality than what most fast food Chinese restaurants offer. If you are looking for high quality Chinese cuisine or cheap, fast Chinese food, this is not the place for you. Su Hong's overall quality lies somewhere in between those two extremes. The restaurant offers a variety of dishes that most Americans are accustomed to seeing on a Chinese menu, but also has a few "authentic" Chinese dishes. I have tried a variety of their entrees, including their chow mein, most poultry dishes, a few red meat dishes, duck and one or two seafood items. The quality of the taste is consistent. I order their Kung Pao chicken the most. Also try their eggplant. And the worst dishes i tasted was their duck, which had a bland, rubbery taste, and their orange chicken, which had too strong of an orange flavor. They have dine in and take out options. Service is reliable and relatively quick. They also do delivery for large orders. My old job used Su Hong's frequently for birthday parties. They also have a full service bar, although hardly anyone ever uses it. I personally think Su Hong is the best middle price range Chinese restaurant in the Palo Alto area. Pros: Relatively consistent taste quality. Not pricey. Offers traditional entrees, most of which are of good to great quality. Service is reliable. Offers dine in, take out and delivery options. Cons: Some of the entrees not traditionally seen in American Chinese restaurants are a bit iffy. Restaurant decor isnt too great (although they are planning to move to Mountain View). Best entrees: Kung Pao, Mushu Pork, Eggplant, Broccoli Beef Worst entrees: Duck, Lemon chicken, Orange chicken Sample Size: I have eaten at Su Hongs over a dozen times, from 2003 to 2008.
awesome food, service a little slow
I was pleasantly surprised, I got delivery and the food came quickly and was hot.  It had a great variety of vegetarian options: I went out on a limb and got the sweet and sour pork (no pork), and it was great!  All of my dishes taste really fresh, which is a nice change of pace.  My two minor complaints are that they didn't give me any duck or soy sauce (so be sure to ask if you want some), and someone else on here said they didn't like the flavors - which I understand with the broccoli in garlic sauce that I got.  Just a personal preference, it might honestly be that I am used to sauces that are heavier and greasier... so it might be a good thing.  I would definitely recommend this place.
Food is actually 3.5 stars, but I'm giving it 2 for the service/suggestion.  I'm okay with rude (they were not rude), I'm not okay with suggestions that only serve to run up the bill.  We had ordered the sigua (squash), meatball, this diced chicken dish that you wrap in lettuce, xiaolongbao.  When we wanted white rice, the waitress asked us if we wanted the shanghai fried rice.  Bad suggestion...even worse decision for taking that suggestion.  The fried rice would've been fine on its own, but it's far too salty/flavorful to go with other dishes we ordered.  You don't have to be polite to your customers, but at least try not to view them as dollar signs!
Had our 22 year anniversary dinner here tonight.  The hostess remembered us from a previous visit.  Everything here is wonderful.  Tonight we dined on Egg Rolls, Plum Sauce Chicken, Mu Shu Pork and Combination Chow Mein.  The food was delectable!  The hostess came back to make sure everything was great and when I told her yes she said "OK if I tell chef he give you happiness"?  How sweet that she told him we were celebrating and they took extra care to make sure everything was absolutely wonderful.
hey what the hell i love to order here, its convienient and i love the lady  taking my order togo, she can never get my name right....so i go with an ailias....nothing wrong here if you want something fast but good....great place.....
How could this restaurant, by any stretch of the imagination, be related to the Menlo Park restaurant???  The won ton soup was absolutely watery and tasteless.  The potstickers extremely bland.  I have always thought the Menlo restaurant had some of the best Mu Shu Pork I've ever had...but what a nightmare ending when our main course arrived.  It ended up being an entire plate of shredded cooked cabbage, a few minuscule pieces of pork,if you really searched for it.  No egg and NO black mushrooms or wood ear.  Just a heaping pile of cabbage.  Having previously been a Denny's location....the lights were so bright and glaring, I ended up with a headache.  The service was absolutely horrible with the staff just standing around and chatting amongst themselves.  And at the time there were ONLY two tables seated.  And they act like they are doing YOU a favor by coming over to your table...when trying to ask merely for a pot of tea.  Will NEVER return to this location.  Ownership needs to LISTEN to the other bad reviews this location has and CHANGE their ATTITUDE immediately.
